Idaho statutes. Title 6 ACTIONS IN PARTICULAR CASES
Chapter 31
LIABILITY OF LAND POSSESSOR TO TRESPASSER

Section.

§ 6-3101. Duty of land possessor to trespasser.

A possessor of any interest in real property, including an owner, lessee or other lawful occupant, owes no duty of care to a trespasser, except to refrain from intentional or willful and wanton acts that cause injury to the trespasser.

§ 6-3102. Attractive nuisance.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect the common law doctrine of attractive nuisance.

§ 6-3103. Applicability.

This chapter does not create or increase the liability of any possessor of real property and does not affect any other statutory or common law immunities from or defenses to civil liability to which a possessor of real property may be entitled.